sl-SI: Oblika podsedelne podloge: Metulj; Anatomska; Z izrezom; Polovična podsedelnica; Numnah; Pravokotna; Okrogla; Oblikovana; Kvadratna; Drugo
hu: Nyeregalátét formája: Pillangó; Kontúrozott; Kivágott; Félalátét; Nyeregformájú alátét; Téglalap alakú; Kerek; Formázott; Szögletes; Egyéb
de: Form des Sattelpads: Schmetterling; Konturiert; Cutback; Halfpad; Sattelförmig; Rechteckig; Rund; Geformt; Quadratisch; Sonstige
sv: Sadelunderlag – form: Fjäril; Konturskuren; Cutback; Halvpad; Vojlock; Rektangulär; Rund; Formskuren; Fyrkantig; Övrigt
ru: Форма вальтрапа: Бабочка; Контурная; С вырезом; Амортизатор; Вальтрап-трилистник; Прямоугольная; Круглая; Фигурная; Квадратная; Другая
sk-SK: Tvar podložky pod sedlo: Motýlik; Tvarovaná; Vykrojená; Polovičná; Numnah; Obdĺžniková; Okrúhla; Tvarovaná; Štvorcová; Iné
zh-TW: 座墊套形狀: 蝴蝶型; 輪廓型; 挖背; 半墊; 鞍型汗墊; 長方形; 圓形; 塑形; 方形; 其他
ko: 안장 패드 모양: 나비형; 윤곽형; 컷백; 하프 패드; 넘나; 직사각형; 원형; 입체형; 정사각형; 기타
pt-PT: Forma da almofada do selim: Borboleta; Contornado; Com recorte; Meia almofada; Suadouro; Retangular; Redondo; Moldado; Quadrado; Outro
pt-BR: Manta de sela formato: Borboleta; Anatômico; Recortado; Meia manta; Numnah; Retangular; Redondo; Moldado; Quadrado; Outros
vi: Hình dạng miếng lót yên ngựa: Hình bướm; Vát uốn lượn; Khoét bớt; Đệm nửa; Numnah; Hình chữ nhật; Hình tròn; Tạo hình; Hình vuông; Khác
es: Forma de la manta de montar: Mariposa; Contorneado; Recortado; Salvacruz; Sudadero anatómico; Rectangular; Redondo; Con forma; Cuadrado; Otro
hr-HR: Oblik podloge za sjedalo: Leptir; Oblikovano; Izrez; Polovična podloga; Podsedlica (Numnah); Pravokutni oblik; Okrugli oblik; Prilagođeni oblik; Kvadratni oblik; Ostalo
fi: Satulahuovan muoto: Perhonen; Muotoiltu; Säkäaukollinen; Puolihuopa; Numnah; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Muotoonleikattu; Neliö; Muu
cs: Tvar podložky pod sedlo: Motýlek; Anatomicky tvarované; Výkroj; Tlumicí dečka; Numnah; Obdélníkové; Kulaté; Tvarované; Čtvercové; Jiné
en: Saddle pad shape: Butterfly; Contoured; Cutback; Half pad; Numnah; Rectangular; Round; Shaped; Square; Other
da: Sadelunderlags form: Sommerfugl; Konturskåret; Cutback; Halfpad; Numnah; Rektangulær; Rund; Formskåret; Firkantet; Andet
ja: サドルパッドの形状: バタフライ; コンター; カットバック; ハーフパッド; ナムナ; 長方形; ラウンド; シェイプ; スクエア; その他
el: Σχήμα σέλας: Πεταλούδα; Ανατομικό; Cutback; Μισό επίθημα; Numnah; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Με συγκεκριμένο σχήμα; Τετράγωνο; Άλλο
tr: Sele altlığı şekli: Kelebek; Konturlu; Kesik; Yarım ped; Numnah; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Şekilli; Kare; Diğer
lt-LT: Balnelio paminkštinimo forma: Drugelio formos; Kontūrinis; Su iškirpte ties podiržiu; Pusinis; Pobalnis („Numnah“); Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Forminis; Kvadratinis; Kita
nl: Zadeldek vorm: Vlinder; Voorgevormd; Cutback; Half-pad; Sjabrak; Rechthoekig; Rond; Gevormd; Vierkant; Overige
th: รูปทรงแผ่นรองอาน: ทรงผีเสื้อ; ทรงเข้ารูป; คัตแบ็ก; ฮาล์ฟแพด; นัมน่าห์; ทรงสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; ขึ้นรูป; ทรงสี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Форма на подложката за седло: Пеперуда; Контурирана; Изрязана (Cutback); Половин подложка; По форма на седлото (Numnah); Правоъгълна; Кръгла; Оформена; Квадратна; Друго
zh-CN: 马鞍垫形状: 蝴蝶形; 轮廓形; 削背形; 半垫; 鞍垫; 长方形; 圆形; 异形; 方形; 其他
nb: Form på salunderlag: Sommerfugl; Konturert; Cutback; Halvpad; Numnah; Rektangulær; Rund; Formsydd; Firkantet; Annet
fr: Forme du tapis de selle: Papillon; Anatomique; Dégarroti; Amortisseur; En forme de selle; Rectangulaire; Rond; Profilé; Carré; Autre
it: Forma del cuscinetto della sella: A farfalla; Sagomato; Cutback; Mezzo pad; Numnah; Rettangolare; Rotondo; A forma; Quadrato; Altro
pl: Kształt czapraka: Motyl; Profilowany; Wycięty; Półpad; Łezka; Prostokątny; Okrągły; Anatomiczny; Kwadratowy; Inny
ro-RO: Formă a valtrapului: Fluture; Conturată; Decupată; Semi-pad; Numnah; Dreptunghiulară; Rotundă; Profilată; Pătrată; Altele